Wisconsin, session 2025, SB420.
do enact as follows:SB420,1Section 1. 66.0132 of the statutes is created to read:66.0132 Prohibiting rights of nature ordinances. (1) Definitions. In this section:(a) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.(b) “Rights of nature ordinance” means an ordinance conferring legal rights to a natural resource to exist, to be protected against pollution, or to maintain a healthy ecosystem.(2) Prohibition. No political subdivision may enact a rights of nature ordinance. Down Down /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb420 true vetoedenrolledbills /2025/related/vetoedinfull/sb420 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB420 vetoedenrolledbills/2025/REG/SB420 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Vetoed in Full»SB420: Text as Enrolled × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting